District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.131

Penalties — Noncompliance with provisions of chapter.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 233, ch. 269, § 131
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 441(d), 32 DCR 4450
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.131.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.32.
1973 Ed., § 29-942.